Georgia, session 2025_26, HB864.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "End Corporate Ownership of Georgia
Homes Act."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 5 of Title 44 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to acquisition and
loss of property, is amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
H. B. 864
- 1 -

LC 62 0112
"ARTICLE 2A
44-5-50.
As used in this article, the term:
(1) 'Corporation' means any entity subject to the annual corporate net worth tax provided
for by Article 4 of Chapter 13 of Title 48 or any entity that would be subject to such tax
if not otherwise excluded by paragraph (2) of Code Section 48-13-71; any person or
entity required to file Form 600, Form 600-S, or Form 700; and real estate investment
trusts. Such term shall include other persons or entities that own more than 20
single-family dwellings. Such term shall not include limited liability corporations that
file as a nonprofit corporation, an entity subject to paragraph (3) of Code
Section 48-13-71, and any entity solely engaged in the construction or rehabilitation of
single-family dwellings that does not conduct business by or on behalf of a business
engaged in another industry.
(2) 'Housing ownership factor' means the total number of single-family dwellings a
corporation owns an interest in on July 1, 2025.
(3) 'Interest' means any right, title, or interest in a single-family dwelling.
(4) 'Real estate investment trust' means an entity that has elected such status for federal
income tax purposes and meets the requirements of Section 856 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended.
(5) 'Single-family dwelling' means any residential property composed of one to four
dwelling units. Such term shall not include unoccupied residences acquired through
foreclosure.
H. B. 864
- 2 -

LC 62 0112
44-5-51.
(a) On or before December 31, 2025, any corporation owning any interest in a
single-family dwelling shall submit a report under penalty of perjury to the state auditor
which shall include:
(1) The total number of single-family dwellings in which the corporation has an interest;
(2) A list identifying each single-family dwelling by county, address, and deed book and
page number;
(3) The purchase price of each single-family dwelling;
(4) The most recent assessed value of each single-family dwelling; and
(5) The ownership interest in each single-family dwelling.
(b) The state auditor shall provide such reports to the commissioner of revenue and the
Department of Community Affairs.
(c) By December 31 of each year starting in 2026, every corporation subject to this article
shall submit a report with the information required by subsection (a) of this Code section.
The report shall also include any single-family dwelling sold since the previous report and
the sale price of such single-family dwelling.
(d) Any corporation that had owned a single-family dwelling on July 1, 2025, but no
longer owns the single-family dwelling on December 31, 2025, shall certify such to the
state auditor.
44-5-52.
The Department of Community Affairs shall create a public portal listing each corporation
that submitted a report pursuant to Code Section 44-5-51. The listing shall include the
number of properties owned by the corporation in each county. The Department of
Community Affairs shall update the portal by March 31 of each year.
H. B. 864
- 3 -

LC 62 0112
44-5-53.
(a)(1) A corporation shall be permitted to own an interest in single-family dwellings as
follows:
(A) By December 31, 2026, a corporation may own an interest in 80 percent of its
housing ownership factor;
(B) By December 31, 2027, a corporation may own an interest in 60 percent of its
housing ownership factor;
(C) By December 31 2028, a corporation may own an interest in 40 percent of its
housing ownership factor; and
(D) By December 31, 2029, a corporation may own an interest in 20 percent of its
housing ownership factor.
(2) Any corporation that at any time owns an interest in single-family dwellings in
excess of the number permitted under this subsection shall be subject to a $750,000.00
fine per excess single-family dwelling in which an interest is owned.
(b) Any corporation owning an interest in a single-family dwelling after December 31,
2030, shall be subject to a $750,000.00 fine per single-family dwelling."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 864
- 4 -